Maryland, session 2025, HB1338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Brownfields site” means:
(i) a former industrial or commercial site identified by federal or
State laws or regulation as contaminated or polluted;
(ii) a closed landfill regulated by the Department of the
Environment; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1338*

HOUSE BILL 1338
(iii) mined land.
(3) (i) “Construction” means:
1. any physical change at a site, including fabrication,
erection, installation, or demolition; or
2. the entry into a binding agreement or contractual
obligation to purchase equipment exclusively for use in construction in the State or to
undertake a program of actual construction in the State which cannot be canceled or
modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator of the proposed generating
station.
(ii) “Construction” does not include a change that is needed for the
temporary use of a site or route for nonutility purposes or for use in securing geological
data, including any boring that is necessary to ascertain foundation conditions.
(4) “ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE” MEANS A RESOURCE THAT:
(I) IS CAPABLE OF ABSORBING ELECTRICAL ENERGY, STORING
IT FOR A PERIOD OF TIME, AND DELIVERING THE ENERGY FOR USE AT A LATER TIME
AS NEEDED, REGARDLESS OF WHERE THE RESOURCE IS LOCATED ON THE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM;
(II) HAS A MINIMUM ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY OF 2
MEGAWATTS; AND
(III) IS INSTALLED IN FRONT OF THE METER.
(5) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity;
2. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current; and
3. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid during time periods when the electric grid is out of service;
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that:
1. are used for the production of electricity from a solar
photovoltaic system or an eligible customer–generator that is subject to the provisions of §
7–306 of this title;

HOUSE BILL 1338 3
2. are located on the same property or adjacent properties;
3. have the capacity to produce, when calculated
cumulatively for all generating units or facilities on the property or adjacent property, more
than 2 megawatts but not more than 14 megawatts of alternating current; and
4. for each individual generating unit or facility:
A. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current;
B. is separately metered by the electric company; and
C. does not export electricity for sale on the wholesale market
under an agreement with PJM Interconnection, LLC;
(iii) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from
the electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system
failure or when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
and
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of a service interruption from
the electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when
there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the
Department of the Environment; and
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(iv) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (iii) of this paragraph.
[(5)] (6) (i) “Mined land” means the surface or subsurface of an area
in which surface mining operations will be, are being, or have been conducted.

HOUSE BILL 1338
(ii) “Mined land” includes:
1. private ways and roads used for mining appurtenant to
any surface mining area;
2. land excavations;
3. workings; and
4. overburden.
[(6)] (7) “Qualified generator lead line” means an overhead transmission
line that is designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts and would allow an
out–of–state Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable source to interconnect with a portion of the electric
system in Maryland that is owned by an electric company.
(b) (1) (i) Unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, a person may not begin construction in
the State of:
1. a generating station; [or]
2. a qualified generator lead line; OR
3. AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE.
(ii) If a person obtains Commission approval for construction under
§ 7–207.1 of this subtitle, the Commission shall exempt a person from the requirement to
obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity under this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a person
may not apply to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity for construction of
a qualified generator lead line unless:
1. at least 90 days before the filing of an application for a
certificate of public convenience and necessity, the person had in good faith offered the
electric company that owns that portion of the electric grid in Maryland to which the
qualified generator lead line would interconnect a full and fair opportunity for the electric
company to construct the qualified generator lead line; and
2. at any time at least 10 days before the filing of an
application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the electric company:
A. did not accept from the person a proposal or a negotiated
version of the proposal under which the electric company would construct the qualified
generator lead line; or

HOUSE BILL 1338 5
B. stated in writing that the electric company did not intend
to construct the qualified generator lead line.
(c) (1) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice immediately or require
the applicant to provide notice immediately of the application to:
(i) the Department of Planning;
(ii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each
county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the generating station, overhead
transmission line, [or] qualified generator lead line, OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE is
proposed to be constructed;
(iii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each
county or municipal corporation within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating
station, overhead transmission line, [or] qualified generator lead line, OR ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICE;
(iv) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
a county in which any portion of the generating station, overhead transmission line, [or]
qualified generator lead line, OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE is proposed to be constructed;
(v) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
each county within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station, overhead
transmission line, [or] qualified generator lead line, OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE;
(vi) for a proposed overhead transmission line, each owner of land
and each owner of adjacent land; and
(vii) all other interested persons.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall provide an opportunity for public
comment and hold a public hearing on the application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity in each county and municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of a generating station, an overhead transmission line designed to carry a
voltage in excess of 69,000 volts, [or] a qualified generator lead line, OR AN ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICE is proposed to be located.
(2) The Commission shall hold the public hearing jointly with the
governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, overhead transmission line, [or] qualified generator
lead line, OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE is proposed to be located, unless the governing
body declines to participate in the hearing.

HOUSE BILL 1338
(3) (ii) Before a public hearing, the Commission shall coordinate with
the governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, overhead transmission line, [or] qualified generator
lead line, OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE is proposed to be located to identify additional
options for providing, in an efficient and cost–effective manner, notice of the public hearing
through other types of media that are familiar to the residents of the county or municipal
corporation.
(e) The Commission shall take final action on an application for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity only after due consideration of:
(1) the recommendation of the governing body of each county or municipal
corporation in which any portion of the construction of the generating station, overhead
transmission line, [or] qualified generator lead line, OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE is
proposed to be located;
(2) the effect of the generating station, overhead transmission line, [or]
qualified generator lead line, OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE on:
(i) the stability and reliability of the electric system;
(ii) economics;
(iii) esthetics;
(iv) historic sites;
(v) aviation safety as determined by the Maryland Aviation
Administration and the administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration;
(vi) when applicable, air quality and water pollution; and
(vii) the availability of means for the required timely disposal of
wastes produced by any generating station;
(3) the effect of climate change on the generating station, overhead
transmission line, [or] qualified generator lead line, OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE based
on the best available scientific information recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on
Climate Change; and
(4) for a generating station:
(i) the consistency of the application with the comprehensive plan
and zoning of each county or municipal corporation where any portion of the generating
station is proposed to be located;

HOUSE BILL 1338 7
(ii) the efforts to resolve any issues presented by a county or
municipal corporation where any portion of the generating station is proposed to be located;
(iii) the impact of the generating station on the quantity of annual
and long–term statewide greenhouse gas emissions, measured in the manner specified in §
2–1202 of the Environment Article and based on the best available scientific information
recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change; and
(iv) the consistency of the application with the State’s climate
commitments for reducing statewide greenhouse gas emissions, including those specified
in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article.
(h) (3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section on receipt of any of the following approvals for any aspect of a generating
station, an overhead transmission line, [or] a qualified lead line, OR AN ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICE proposed to be constructed under the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to the construction of any energy storage device before the effective date of this
Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.